Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB847.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 901 of Title 8 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 901. Filling vacancies in elective borough offices.(a) Vacancies.--If any vacancy occurs in the office of the mayor, member of council, auditor, controller or tax collector, by death, resignation under subsection (a.1) or termination of residency from the borough, or from a ward in the case of a ward office, or by failure to take the required oath, to give bond as provided by law or ordinance or to provide the affidavit required under section 801 (relating to eligibility), or in any other manner whatsoever, the council shall fill the vacancy within 30 days by appointing, by resolution, a registered elector of the borough, or of the ward in the case of a ward 12345678910111213141516171819 office, to hold the office, if the term continues that long, until the first Monday in January after the first municipal election occurring more than 60 days after the vacancy occurs, at which election an eligible individual shall be elected to the office for the remainder of the term. Except as provided in section 801(c), no individual shall be appointed to fill a vacancy in an elected borough or ward office unless the individual has resided within the borough, or within the ward in the case of a ward office, continuously for at least one year immediately prior to the individual's appointment.(a.1) Vacancy by resignation.--Except as provided under subsection (e), the following shall apply:(1) A vacancy shall not be created by a resignation until the date that the resignation is accepted by a majority vote of a quorum of council at a public meeting or the effective date of the tendered resignation, whichever is later. A council must accept a resignation no later than 45 days after it has been tendered in writing to council, unless it is withdrawn in writing prior to acceptance.(2) A resignation which is not accepted as provided under paragraph (1) shall be deemed accepted after 45 days.(b) Bond.--The individual appointed shall give bond if required by law or ordinance. If the individual elected to the office fails to give any bond required, to provide the affidavit required under section 801 or to take the required oath, the council, before making the appointment, shall declare the office vacant.(c) [Unfilled vacancies.--If the council of any borough refuses, fails, neglects or is unable, for any reason whatsoever, to fill any vacancy within 30 days after the vacancy 20250SB0847PN0939 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 happens, as provided in this section, the vacancy shall be filled within 15 additional days by the vacancy board.] Vacancy board.--(1) A vacancy board shall be convened to fill any vacancy within 15 days if the council of any borough, for any reason, fails to fill a vacancy after 30 days. Council may vote to convene the vacancy board within 30 days of a vacancy if the council is unable, for any reason, to fill the vacancy and provides the justification in a public meeting.(2) The vacancy board shall consist of the council, exclusive of the mayor, and one registered elector of the borough who shall be appointed by the council at the council's first meeting each calendar year or as soon as practical and who shall act as chair of the vacancy board. The chair of the vacancy board shall not vote for himself or herself to fill the vacancy in an elective borough office.(3) The vacancy board shall appoint a registered elector of the borough, or ward in the case of a ward office, to hold the office, if the term continues that long, until the first Monday in January after the first municipal election occurring more than 60 days after the vacancy occurs, at which election an eligible individual shall be elected to the office for the remainder of the term.(d) [Board petition.--If the vacancy is not filled by the vacancy board within 15 days, the] Vacancy board petition.--The vacancy board chair shall, or, in the case of a vacancy in the chair, the remaining members of the vacancy board shall, petition the court of common pleas to fill the vacancy by the appointment of a registered elector of the borough, or ward in the case of a ward, to hold the office, if the term continues 20250SB0847PN0939 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that long, until the first Monday in January after the first municipal election occurring more than 60 days after the vacancy occurs, at which election an eligible individual shall be elected to the office for the remainder of the term[.(e) Elector petition.--If vacancies exist in more than a majority of the offices of council, the court of common pleas shall fill the vacancies upon presentation of petition signed by not less than 15 registered electors of the borough.] if either of the following occur:(1) the vacancy board fails to fill the position within 15 days; or(2) the position of chairperson is vacant and the remaining members of the vacancy board provide a justification as to why the remaining members cannot fill the position sooner than 15 days and vote publicly to disband.(e) General vacancy petition.--Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if vacancies exist in more than a majority of the offices of council, the court of common pleas shall fill the vacancies upon presentation of petition signed by not less than 15 registered electors of the borough or the remaining council members. A resignation that precludes a majority of council members from acting to accept the resignation shall create a vacancy on the date specified in the tendered resignation or, if no date is specified, the second business day after the day tendered, unless sooner withdrawn in writing.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0847PN0939 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627